Utah statutes.
7-19-2.   Supervisory acquisition or merger authorized or required by
commissioner.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the commissioner, or any
receiver or liquidator appointed by the commissioner, may solicit offers from
and authorize, require, or give effect to, a supervisory acquisition of, or a
supervisory merger with respect to a failing or failed depository institution
or failing or failed depository institution holding company by a Utah
depository institution, an out-of-state depository institution, a Utah
depository institution holding company, or an out-of-state depository
institution holding company.
